Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-3405
Transfer on death deed authorized.

An individual
may transfer property to one or more beneficiaries effective at the transferor's
death by a transfer on death deed. If the property is agricultural land, the
transferor may designate in the transfer on death deed the disposition of
the transferor's interest in growing crops to the transferor's estate or to
one or more of the designated beneficiaries. If the property is agricultural
land and the transfer on death deed does not contain a designation of the
disposition of the transferor's interest in growing crops, the transferor's
interest in the growing crops shall pass to the transferor's estate.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 5.